
off_year a year in which productivity is low or inferior.
harvest_moon the full moon nearest the September equinox.
id_al-adha feast_of_sacrifice the 10th day of Dhu'l-Hijja; all Muslims attend a service in the mosques and those who are not pilgrims perform a ritual slaughter of a sheep (commemorating God's ransom of Abraham's son from sacrifice) and give at least a third of the meat to charity.
silver_age (classical mythology) the second age of the world, characterized by opulence and irreligion; by extension, a period secondary in achievement to a golden age.
bronze_age (classical mythology) the third age of the world, marked by war and violence.
bronze_age (archeology) a period between the Stone and Iron Ages, characterized by the manufacture and use of bronze tools and weapons.
iron_age (classical mythology) the last and worst age of the world.
iron_age (archeology) the period following the Bronze Age; characterized by rapid spread of iron tools and weapons.
eolithic_age eolithic the earliest part of the Stone Age marked by the earliest signs of human culture.
long_run long_haul a period of time sufficient for factors to work themselves out; "in the long run we will win"; "in the long run we will all be dead"; "he performed well over the long haul".
by-and-by an indefinite time in the future; "he'll get around to it in the sweet by-and-by".
golden_age any period (sometimes imaginary) of great peace and prosperity and happiness.
modern_era the present or recent times.
jazz_age the 1920s in the United States characterized in the novels of F. Scott Fitzgerald as a period of wealth, youthful exuberance, and carefree hedonism.
tomorrow the near future; "tomorrow's world"; "everyone hopes for a better tomorrow".
allegretto a quicker tempo than andante but not as fast as allegro.
rubato a flexible tempo; not strictly on the beat.
rate_of_attrition attrition_rate the rate of shrinkage in size or number.
gigahertz gigacycle_per_second gigacycle ghz gc 1,000,000,000 periods per second.
thz terahertz one trillion periods per second.
hypervelocity excessive velocity; "the meteorites struck the earth with hypervelocity impacts".
incubation_period the period between infection and the appearance of symptoms of the disease.
regency the period from 1811-1820 when the Prince of Wales was regent during George III's periods of insanity.
scarcely hardly almost not; "he hardly ever goes fishing"; "he was hardly more than sixteen years old"; "they scarcely ever used the emergency generator".
annoyingly in an annoying manner or to an annoying degree.
boiling extremely; "boiling mad".
negatively in a negative way; "he was negatively inclined".
negatively in a harmful manner; "he was negatively affected".
grossly in a gross manner.
insignificantly not to a significant degree or amount; "Our budget will only be insignificantly affected by these new cuts".
imperfectly amiss in an imperfect or faulty way; "The lobe was imperfectly developed"; "Miss Bennet would not play at all amiss if she practiced more"- Jane Austen.
amiss in an improper or mistaken or unfortunate manner; "if you think him guilty you judge amiss"; "he spoke amiss"; "no one took it amiss when she spoke frankly".
only with nevertheless the final result; "He arrived only to find his wife dead"; "We won only to lose again in the next round".
poorly ill badly (`ill' is often used as a combining form) in a poor or improper or unsatisfactory manner; not well; "he was ill prepared"; "it ill befits a man to betray old friends"; "the car runs badly"; "he performed badly on the exam"; "the team played poorly"; "ill-fitting clothes"; "an ill-conceived plan".
ill with difficulty or inconvenience; scarcely or hardly; "we can ill afford to buy a new car just now".
badly0 with unusual distress or resentment or regret or emotional display; "they took their defeat badly"; "took her father's death badly"; "conducted himself very badly at the time of the earthquake".
ill badly unfavorably or with disapproval; "tried not to speak ill of the dead"; "thought badly of him for his lack of concern".
well2 comfortably in financial comfort; "They live well"; "she has been able to live comfortably since her husband died".
disadvantageously badly in a disadvantageous way; to someone's disadvantage; "the venture turned out badly for the investors"; "angry that the case was settled disadvantageously for them".
badly without skill or in a displeasing manner; "she writes badly"; "I think he paints very badly".
unsatisfactorily in an unsatisfactory manner; "He performed unsatisfactorily as a manager".
severely seriously gravely badly to a severe or serious degree; "fingers so badly frozen they had to be amputated"; "badly injured"; "a severely impaired heart"; "is gravely ill"; "was seriously ill".
badly bad very much; strongly; "I wanted it badly enough to work hard for it"; "the cables had sagged badly"; "they were badly in need of help"; "he wants a bicycle so bad he can taste it".
badly bad with great intensity (`bad' is a nonstandard variant for `badly'); "the injury hurt badly"; "the buildings were badly shaken"; "it hurts bad"; "we need water bad".
naughtily mischievously badly in a disobedient or naughty way; "he behaved badly in school"; "he mischievously looked for a chance to embarrass his sister"; "behaved naughtily when they had guests and was sent to his room".
worst to the highest degree of inferiority or badness; "She suffered worst of all"; "schools were the worst hit by government spending cuts"; "the worst dressed person present".
yet still even to a greater degree or extent; used with comparisons; "looked sick and felt even worse"; "an even (or still) more interesting problem"; "still another problem must be solved"; "a yet sadder tale".
even in spite of; notwithstanding; "even when he is sick, he works"; "even with his head start she caught up with him".
rather quite to a degree (not used with a negative); "quite tasty"; "quite soon"; "quite ill"; "quite rich".
invariably constantly always without variation or change, in every case; "constantly kind and gracious"; "he always arrives on time".
never ne'er not ever; at no time in the past or future; "I have never been to China"; "I shall never forget this day"; "had never seen a circus"; "never on Sunday"; "I will never marry you!".
never not at all; certainly not; not in any circumstances; "never fear"; "bringing up children is never easy"; "that will never do"; "what is morally wrong can never be politically right".
sometime at some indefinite or unstated time; "let's get together sometime"; "everything has to end sometime"; "It was to be printed sometime later".
every_bit equally as to the same degree (often followed by `as'); "they were equally beautiful"; "birds were singing and the child sang as sweetly"; "sang as sweetly as a nightingale"; "he is every bit as mean as she is".
that_much to a certain degree; "we will be that much ahead of them".
not non negation of a word or group of words; "he does not speak French"; "she is not going"; "they are not friends"; "not many"; "not much"; "not at all".
no used to express refusal or denial or disagreement etc or especially to emphasize a negative statement; "no, you are wrong".
no not in any degree or manner; not at all; "he is no better today".
none not at all or in no way; "seemed none too pleased with his dinner"; "shirt looked none the worse for having been slept in"; "none too prosperous"; "the passage is none too clear".
damn bloody all-fired extremely; "you are bloody right"; "Why are you so all-fired aggressive?".
nowhere not anywhere; in or at or to no place; "I am going nowhere".
somehow for some unspecified reason; "It doesn't seem fair somehow"; "he had me dead to rights but somehow I got away with it";.
as_it_is in the actual state of affairs and often contrary to expectations; "he might have been killed; as it is he was severely injured".
yet withal still notwithstanding nonetheless nevertheless however even_so all_the_same despite anything to the contrary (usually following a concession); "although I'm a little afraid, however I'd like to try it"; "while we disliked each other, nevertheless we agreed"; "he was a stern yet fair master"; "granted that it is dangerous, all the same I still want to go".
lightly with indifference or without dejection; "he took it lightly".
fugally in a fugal style.
futilely in a futile and unproductive manner.
still with reference to action or condition; without change, interruption, or cessation; "it's still warm outside"; "will you still love me when we're old and grey?".
no_more no_longer not now; "she is no more".
mildly to a moderate degree; "he was mildly interested".
anon (old-fashioned or informal) in a little while; "see you anon".
soon shortly presently before_long in the near future; "the doctor will soon be here"; "the book will appear shortly"; "she will arrive presently"; "we should have news before long".
turbulently stormily passionately in a stormy or violent manner.
seldom rarely not often; "we rarely met".
somewhat reasonably pretty passably moderately middling jolly fairly to a moderately sufficient extent or degree; "pretty big"; "pretty bad"; "jolly decent of him"; "the shoes are priced reasonably"; "he is fairly clever with computers".
in_the_lurch in a difficult or vulnerable position; "he resigned and left me in the lurch".
in_vacuo in a vacuum.
in_vacuo in isolation and without reference to anything else.
of_course naturally course as might be expected; "naturally, the lawyer sent us a huge bill".
unnaturally in a manner at variance with what is natural or normal; "The early Church not unnaturally adopted the position that failure to see the messianic character of his work was really caused by the people's own blindness".
unexpectedly out_of_the_blue in a way that was not expected; "her brother showed up at the wedding out of the blue".
out_of_the_way so as not to obstruct or hinder; "put that box out of the way so that no one trips on it".
out_of_the_way dealt with; disposed of; "I'm so relieved that my midterm is out of the way".
out_of_the_way murdered; "the mob boss wanted his rival out of the way".
out_of_the_way in a remote location or at a distance from the usual route; "the restaurant is top-notch, but a little out of the way".
out_of_the_way improper; amiss;.
out_of_the_way extraordinary; unusual; "such erratic behavior was out of the way for him".
in_the_main in_general generally without distinction of one from others; "he is interested in snakes in general".
unhappily sadly in an unfortunate way; "sadly he died before he could see his grandchild".
unluckily unfortunately regrettably alas by bad luck; "unfortunately it rained all day"; "alas, I cannot stay".
face-to-face within each other's presence; "she met the president face-to-face".
opposite face-to-face directly facing each other; "the two photographs lay face-to-face on the table"; "lived all their lives in houses face-to-face across the street"; "they sat opposite at the table".
tete_a_tete without the intrusion of a third person; in intimate privacy; "we talked tete-a-tete".
super passing extremely exceedingly to an extreme degree; "extremely cold"; "extremely unpleasant".
drop-dead extremely; "she was drop-dead gorgeous".
beyond_measure in excess or without limit; "amazed beyond measure".
madly insanely devilishly deucedly deadly (used as intensives) extremely; "she was madly in love"; "deadly dull"; "deadly earnest"; "deucedly clever"; "insanely jealous".
inordinately extraordinarily extremely; "she was inordinately smart"; "it will be an extraordinarily painful step to negotiate".
too to_a_fault overly excessively to a degree exceeding normal or proper limits; "too big".
yet in_time within an indefinite time or at an unspecified future time; "he longed for the flowers that were yet to show themselves"; "sooner or later you will have to face the facts"; "in time they came to accept the harsh reality".
straightaway straight_off right_away now like_a_shot instantly immediately forthwith directly at_once without delay or hesitation; with no time intervening; "he answered immediately"; "found an answer straightaway"; "an official accused of dishonesty should be suspended forthwith"; "Come here now!".
now_now interjection of rebuke.
steadily at a steady rate or pace; "his interest eroded steadily".
unhappily in an unpleasant way; "they were unhappily married".
squarely forthrightly forthright directly and without evasion; not roundabout; "to face a problem squarely"; "the responsibility lies squarely with them"; "spoke forthright (or forthrightly) and to the point".
squarely square in a straight direct way; "looked him squarely in the eye"; "ran square into me".
bitterly indicating something hard to accept; "he was bitterly disappointed".
by_hand without the use of a machine; "this dress is sewn by hand".
terribly rottenly awfully atrociously abysmally abominably in a terrible manner; "she sings terribly".
unacceptably intolerably to an unacceptable degree; "The percentage of lead in our drinking water is unacceptably high".
horribly dreadfully awfully of a dreadful kind; "there was a dreadfully bloody accident on the road this morning".
not_by_a_long_sight not_by_a_blame_sight by_no_means definitely not; "the prize is by no means certain"; "and that isn't all, not by a long sight".
indirectly not in a forthright manner; "he answered very indirectly".
not_to_mention let_alone much less; "she can't boil potatoes, let alone cook a meal".
blindly without preparation or reflection; without a rational basis; "they bought the car blindly"; "he picked a wife blindly".
affectedly in an affected manner.
softly quietly with low volume; "speak softly but carry a big stick"; "she spoke quietly to the child"; "the radio was playing softly".
nearby not far away in relative terms; "she works nearby"; "the planets orbiting nearby are Venus and Mars".
scantily barely in a sparse or scanty way; "a barely furnished room".
brilliantly in an extremely intelligent way; "he solved the problem brilliantly".
into_the_bargain in_the_bargain in addition; over and above what is expected; "He lost his wife in the bargain".
contemptibly in a manner deserving contempt.
daily every day; without missing a day; "he stops by daily".
weekly hebdomadally every_week each_week without missing a week; "she visited her aunt weekly".
yearly every_year each_year annually without missing a year; "they travel to China annually".
misleadingly deceptively deceivingly in a misleading way; "the exam looked deceptively easy".
depressingly in a depressing manner or to a depressing degree.
tongue-in-cheek jokingly facetiously not seriously; "I meant it facetiously".
like_blue_murder flat_out at top speed; "he ran flat out to catch the bus"; "he was off down the road like blue murder".
impermissibly not permissibly; "the radon level in the basement was impermissibly high".
ad_infinitum to infinity; without or seemingly without limit; "talked on and on ad infinitum".
magnetically as if by magnetism; "he was magnetically attracted to her".
perilously hazardously dangerously in a dangerous manner; "he came dangerously close to falling off the ledge".
intently with strained or eager attention; "listened intently"; "stood watching intently".
hard slowly and with difficulty; "prejudices die hard".
severely hard causing great damage or hardship; "industries hit hard by the depression"; "she was severely affected by the bank's failure".
hard with pain or distress or bitterness; "he took the rejection very hard".
inconclusively not conclusively; "the meeting ended inconclusively".
woefully sadly lamentably deplorably in an unfortunate or deplorable manner; "he was sadly neglected"; "it was woefully inadequate".
downwards downwardly downward down spatially or metaphorically from a higher to a lower level or position; "don't fall down"; "rode the lift up and skied down"; "prices plunged downward".
down in an inactive or inoperative state; "the factory went down during the strike"; "the computer went down again".
down to a lower intensity; "he slowly phased down the light until the stage was completely black".
outright without reservation or concealment; "she asked him outright for a divorce".
outright without restrictions or stipulations or further payments; "buy outright".
little not much; "he talked little about his family".
tardily late belatedly later than usual or than expected; "the train arrived late"; "we awoke late"; "the children came late to school"; "notice came so tardily that we almost missed the deadline"; "I belatedly wished her a happy birthday".
at_first_sight at_first_glance immediately; "it was love at first sight".
at_the_least at_least not less than; "at least two hours studying the manual"; "a tumor at least as big as an orange".
at_the_most at_most not more than; "spend at most $20 on the lunch".
leastwise leastways at_least at_any_rate if nothing else (`leastwise' is informal and `leastways' is colloquial); "at least he survived"; "they felt--at any rate Jim felt--relieved though still wary"; "the influence of economists--or at any rate of economics--is far-reaching".
right immediately; "she called right after dinner".
right_away promptly at once (usually modifies an undesirable occurrence); "he promptly forgot the address".
frenetically demoniacally in a very agitated manner; as if possessed by an evil spirit.
unscientifically in an unscientific way; not according to the principles of science; "they proceeded unscientifically when they dissected the mummy".
macroscopically without using a microscope; "The tubes were examined macroscopically".
virtually in essence or effect but not in fact; "the strike virtually paralyzed the city"; "I'm virtually broke".
unofficially not in an official capacity; "unofficially, he serves as the treasurer".
physically in accord with physical laws; "it is physically impossible".
outrageously in a very offensive manner; "he behaved outrageously".
regardless no_matter irrespective disregardless disregarding in spite of everything; without regard to drawbacks; "he carried on regardless of the difficulties".
irregardless regardless; a combination of irrespective and regardless sometimes used humorously.
injuriously in an injurious manner.
legally in a legal manner; "he acted legally".
infernally hellishly extremely; "infernally clever"; "hellishly dangerous".
catastrophically with unfortunate consequences; "catastrophically complex".
nonlexically without the use of words; "expressed nonlexically".
unnaturally by_artificial_means artificially not according to nature; not by natural means; "artificially induced conditions".
wickedly evilly in a wicked evil manner; "act wickedly"; "grin evilly".
after_a_fashion to some extent; not very well; "he speaks French after a fashion".
after_all in spite of expectations; "came to the party after all"; "it didn't rain after all".
after_hours not during regular hours; "he often worked after hours".
all_the_way not stopping short of sexual intercourse; "she went all the way with him".
comfortably in mental comfort; without stress; "he works comfortably on three continents".
comfortably in physical comfort; "she could have been lying comfortably in bed getting the same relief".
uncomfortably in physical discomfort; "she lay on the couch, her body uncomfortably twisted".
by_fits_and_starts intermittently; "he worked on his book by fits and starts".
every_so_often every_now_and_then occasionally; "every so often she visits her father".
incompletely not to a full degree or extent; "words incompletely understood"; "a form filled out incompletely".
topsy-turvy topsy-turvily in_great_confusion heels_over_head head_over_heels in disorderly haste; "we ran head over heels toward the shelter".
heedlessly carelessly without care or concern; "carelessly raised the children's hopes without thinking of their possible disappointment".
in_name_only in_name by title or repute though not in fact; "he's a doctor in name only".
soon_enough in_time without being tardy; "we made it to the party in time".
unsuccessfully without success; "she tried unsuccessfully to persuade him to buy a new car".
off_the_record not for quotation; "he spoke to the reporter off the record".
to_the_contrary on_the_contrary contrariwise contrarily contrary to expectations; "he didn't stay home; on the contrary, he went out with his friends".
on_the_spot without delay or immediately; "we hired her on the spot"; "thought they were going to shoot us down on the spot".
on_the_spot in a difficult situation; "that question really put him on the spot".
to_the_limit to_the_hilt in full; "you are in this to the hilt".
blindly without seeing or looking; "he felt around his desk blindly".
unsteadily uncertainly falteringly in an unsteady manner; "he walked unsteadily toward the exit"; "The wounded soldier was swinging unsteadily on his legs".
wildly with violent and uncontrollable passion; "attacked wildly, slashing and stabbing over and over".
bleakly without hope; "he wondered bleakly".
reciprocally inversely in an inverse or contrary manner; "inversely related"; "wavelength and frequency are, of course, related reciprocally"- F.A.Geldard.
intemperately heavily hard indulging excessively; "he drank heavily".
day_in_day_out day_after_day for an indefinite number of successive days.
week_after_week for an indefinite number of successive weeks.
neatly with neatness; "she put the slippers under the bed neatly".
independently on your own; without outside help; "the children worked on the project independently".
aside apart not taken into account or excluded from consideration; "these problems apart, the country is doing well"; "all joking aside, I think you're crazy".
positively extremely; "it was positively monumental".
irritably in an irritable manner; "she had become irritably exact".
professedly with pretense or intention to deceive; "is only professedly poor".
off no longer on or in contact or attached; "clean off the dirt"; "he shaved off his mustache".
needlessly without need; "it would needlessly bring badness into the world".
tremendously staggeringly hugely enormously extremely; "he was enormously popular".
stubbornly pig-headedly obstinately obdurately mulishly cussedly in a stubborn unregenerate manner; "she remained stubbornly in the same position".
hopelessly without hope; desperate because there seems no possibility of comfort or success; "he hung his head hopelessly"; "`I must die,' he said hopelessly".
maliciously with malice; in a malicious manner; "she answered maliciously".
unwisely foolishly without good sense or judgment; "He acted foolishly when he agreed to come".
wrongly without justice or fairness; "wouldst not play false and yet would wrongly win"- Shakespeare.
unmistakably without possibility of mistake; "this watercolor is unmistakably a synthesis of nature".
unreasonably not in a reasonable or intelligent manner; "she reacted unreasonably when she learned she had failed".
unpleasantly in an unpleasant manner; "he had been unpleasantly surprised".
loosely generally broadly_speaking broadly without regard to specific details or exceptions; "he interprets the law broadly".
behind in or into an inferior position; "fell behind in his studies"; "their business was lagging behind in the competition for customers".
vauntingly large boastfully big in a boastful manner; "he talked big all evening".
unwarily without heed or caution.
angrily with anger; "he angrily denied the accusation".
noisily with much noise or loud and unpleasant sound; "he blew his nose noisily".
quietly quiet with little or no activity or no agitation (`quiet' is a nonstandard variant for `quietly'); "her hands rested quietly in her lap"; "the rock star was quietly led out the back door"; "sit here as quiet as you can".
unqualifiedly without qualification or limitation.
gloomily with gloom; "such a change is gloomily foreseen by many".
cruelly excessively; "a cruelly bitter winter".
out_of motivated by; "idleness is the trait of being idle out of a reluctance to work".
by away1 aside in reserve; not for immediate use; "started setting aside money to buy a car"; "put something by for her old age"; "has a nest egg tucked away for a rainy day".
away aside out of the way (especially away from one's thoughts); "brush the objections aside"; "pushed all doubts away".
tenaciously doggedly with obstinate determination; "he pursued her doggedly".
dully without luster or shine; "the light shone dully through the haze"; "unpolished buttons glinted dully".
unwittingly unknowingly inadvertently without knowledge or intention; "he unwittingly deleted the references".
scienter (law) deliberately or knowingly.
slickly glibly with superficial plausibility; "he talked glibly".
overwhelmingly overpoweringly irresistibly incapable of being resisted; "the candy looked overwhelmingly desirable to the dieting man".
sternly severely with sternness; in a severe manner; "`No,' she said sternly"; "peered severely over her glasses".
irresolutely lacking determination or decisiveness.
willy-nilly without having a choice.
indecently in an indecent manner; "she was rather indecently dressed".
perversely deliberately deviant; "his perversely erotic notions".
perversely contrariwise contrarily in a contrary disobedient manner.
sine_die without a date fixed (as of an adjournment).
offstage not in public; "the deal was done offstage".
torturously excruciatingly agonizingly in a very painful manner; "the progress was agonizingly slow".
anonymously without giving a name; "she wrote these letters anonymously".
offhandedly offhanded offhand without previous thought or preparation; "couldn't give the figures offhand"; "we decided offhand to go to Canada"; "she had made these remarks offhandedly".
casually not methodically or according to plan; "he dealt with his course work casually".
abstrusely in a manner difficult to understand; "the professor's abstrusely reasoned theories were wasted on his students".
ashamedly with a feeling of shame.
assuredly without a doubt; "the grammar schools were assuredly not intended for the gentry alone".
bloodily involving a great bloodshed.
askance with suspicion or disapproval; "he looked askance at the offer".
amain with all your strength; "he pulled the ropes amain".
unseasonably not in accordance with the season; "it was unseasonably cold".
barebacked bareback without a saddle; "she prefers to ride her horse bareback".
cantankerously in a bad mood; "he answered her cantankerously".
freakishly capriciously unpredictably; "the weather has been freakishly variable".
cautiously carefully as if with kid gloves; with caution or prudence or tact; "she ventured cautiously downstairs"; "they handled the incident with kid gloves".
incautiously carelessly without caution or prudence; "one unfortunately sees historic features carelessly lost when estates fall into unsympathetic hands".
interminably endlessly all the time; seemingly without stopping; "a theological student with whom I argued interminably"; "her nagging went on endlessly".
fairly fair clean in conformity with the rules or laws and without fraud or cheating; "they played fairly".
conditionally subject to a condition; "he accepted the offer conditionally".
unconditionally not subject to a condition; "he accepted the offer unconditionally".
crosswise not in the intended manner; "things are going crosswise".
grumpily grouchily crossly in an ill-natured manner; "she looked at her husband crossly".
inconsequently inconsequentially lacking consequence; "`You're so beautifully dressed,' she said and added quite inconsequentially, `Can you stay the night?'".
unbelievably incredibly improbably implausibly not easy to believe; "behind you the coastal hills plunge to the incredibly blue sea backed by the Turkish mountains".
indecisively lacking firmness or resoluteness; "`I don't know,' he said indecisively".
impossibly to a degree impossible of achievement; "long thought to be an impossibly difficult operation"; "impossibly far from sources of supply".
reprehensibly culpably in a manner or to a degree deserving blame or censure.
unwillingly in an unwilling manner; "he had sinned against her unwillingly".
offensively in an unpleasantly offensive manner; "he smelled offensively unwashed".
deliriously as if in a delirium; "he was talking deliriously".
disconsolately desolately in grief-stricken loneliness; without comforting circumstances or prospects.
fiendishly diabolically devilishly as a devil; in an evil manner; "his writing could be diabolically satiric".
destructively in a destructive manner; "he is destructively aggressive".
repulsively odiously detestably abominably in an offensive and hateful manner; "I don't know anyone who could have behaved so abominably".
noxiously harmfully detrimentally in a detrimental manner.
disagreeably in a disagreeable manner; "`I took no harm from the journey, thank you,' she said disagreeably".
sickeningly revoltingly distastefully disgustingly in a disgusting manner or to a disgusting degree; "the beggar was disgustingly filthy".
dishonorably with dishonor; "he was dishonorably discharged".
disloyally without loyalty; in a disloyal manner; "his men acted disloyally and betrayed him in the end".
hopelessly dispiritedly in a dispirited manner without hope; "the first Mozartian opera to be subjected to this curious treatment ran dispiritedly for five performances".
displeasingly in a displeasing manner; "he made displeasingly cutting remarks about his friends".
distressfully with distress; "`Doctor Rother says it's his only chance,' she added distressfully".
distributively in a distributive manner; "marine vertebrates have their weight supported distributively by the water".
sorrowfully dolefully with sadness; in a sorrowful manner; "his mother looked at him dolefully when he told her he had joined the Army".
downhill toward a lower or inferior state; "your performance has been going downhill for a long time now".
embarrassingly causing embarrassment; "the great man was embarrassingly humble and self-effacing".
unethically in an unethical manner; "he behaved unethically".
expressively with expression; in an expressive manner; "she gave the order to the waiter, using her hands very expressively".
faultlessly without a fault; in a faultless manner; "he solved all the problems faultlessly".
feelingly with great feeling; "she spoke feelingly of her early childhood".
forbiddingly in an unpleasant or menacing manner; "it was forbiddingly dark in the corridor".
forcefully with full force; "we are seeing this film too late to feel its original impact forcefully".
foully in a wicked and shameful manner; "two policemen were foully murdered".
fraudulently in a dishonest and fraudulent manner; "this money was fraudulently obtained".
frostily frigidly without warmth or enthusiasm; "`Come in if you have to,' he said frostily".
generically without a trademark or brand name; "we market these drugs generically".
goddamned goddamn goddam extremely; "you are goddamn right!".
roughly rough with roughness or violence (`rough' is an informal variant for `roughly'); "he was pushed roughly aside"; "they treated him rough".
monstrously heinously in a terribly evil manner; "the child was heinously murdered".
out_of_wedlock illegitimately of biological parents not married to each other; "this child was born illegitimately".
immovably so as to be incapable of moving; "the mountains brooded immovably above the river".
immorally amorally without regard for morality; "he acted immorally when his own interests were at stake".
implicitly without doubting or questioning; "I implicitly trust him".
inadequately in an inadequate manner or to an inadequate degree; "the temporary camps were inadequately equipped".
incurably in a manner impossible to cure; "he is incurably ill".
indiscreetly without discretion or wisdom or self-restraint; "she inquired indiscreetly after the state of his health".
uninstructively uninformatively in an uninformative manner; "`I can't tell you when the manager will arrive,' he said rather uninformatively".
unfeignedly truly sincerely with sincerity; without pretense; "she praised him sincerely for his victory"; "was unfeignedly glad to see his old teacher"; "we are truly sorry for the inconvenience".
insubstantially impalpably not substantially; lacking substantial expression or fullness.
invisibly without being seen; "these organisms enter the body invisibly".
ironically contrary to plan or expectation; "ironically, he ended up losing money under his own plan".
obscenely lewdly in a lewd and obscene manner; "he had seen how in their dances the white men and women held one another obscenely".
lifelessly without animation or vitality; "lifelessly he performed the song".
unmanly unmanfully without qualities thought to befit a man.
malignantly in a malignant manner, as of a tumor that spreads.
malignly in a malign and evil manner.
meanly poorly or in an inferior manner; "troops meanly equipped".
sadly with sadness; in a sad manner; "`She died last night,' he said sadly".
murderously as if bent on murder; "the huge dog bore down on them with bared fangs and barking murderously".
nakedly in an exposed manner; without protection or defense; "they were attacked as they huddled nakedly on the bare hill".
nastily meanly in a nasty ill-tempered manner; "`Don't expect me to help you,' he added nastily".
palely in a pale manner; without physical or emotional color; "his wife, always palely appealing".
pathetically arousing scornful pity; "they had pathetically little money"; "it was pathetically bad".
piercingly bitterly bitter bitingly extremely and sharply; "it was bitterly cold"; "bitter cold".
steaming piping (used of heat) extremely; "the casserole was piping hot".
prestissimo extremely fast; as fast as possible; "this passage should be played prestissimo".
regretfully with regret (used in polite formulas); "I must regretfully decline your kind invitation".
plaguy plaguily plaguey in a disagreeable manner; "it's so plaguey cold!".
preciously precious extremely; "there is precious little time left".
unprofitably profitlessly gainlessly without gain or profit.
pryingly in a curious and prying manner; "`Do you have a boyfriend,' she asked her prospective tenant pryingly".
pungently with a pungent taste or smell; "the soup was pungently flavored".
purposelessly without a clear purpose; "let's not purposelessly dispense the aid".
raggedly jaggedly with a ragged and uneven appearance; "a long beard, raggedly cut".
right-down positively; "a regular right-down bad 'un"--Charles Dickens.
roaring extremely; "roaring drunk".
scorching capable of causing burns; "it was scorching hot".
inseparably without possibility of separation; "these two are inseparably linked".
shakily in a manner characterized by trembling or shaking; "`I--I'm going to make you a cup of tea', she explained shakily".
sheer perpendicularly straight up or down without a break.
unawares short at a disadvantage; "I was caught short".
simperingly pusillanimously with a lack of courage and determination; "simperingly, the accused begged for mercy".
single-handedly single-handed without assistance; "I built this house single-handedly".
snappishly in an ill-natured and snappish manner; "`Don't talk to me now,' she said snappishly".
sopping soaking dripping extremely wet; "dripping wet"; "soaking wet".
soundlessly noiselessly without a sound; "he stood up soundlessly and speechlessly and glided across the hallway and through a door".
stiff extremely; "bored stiff"; "frightened stiff".
stock-still still without moving or making a sound; "he sat still as a statue"; "time stood still"; "they waited stock-still outside the door"; "he couldn't hold still any longer".
therewithal together with all that; besides; "thy slanders I forgive; and therewithal remit thy other forfeits"- Shakespeare.
tastelessly without taste or in poor taste; in a tasteless manner; "the house was tastelessly decorated".
tetchily in an ill-natured and tetchy manner; "`Are you sure?' he asked her tetchily".
thickly spoken with poor articulation as if with a thick tongue; "after a few drinks he was beginning to speak thickly".
thinly without force or sincere effort; "smiled thinly".
toughly in a ruggedly tough manner; "toughly vigorous story-telling".
trivially with little effort; "we can prove trivially that this theorem is false".
unawares without forethought or plan; inadvertently; "came upon the diamond unawares".
unwantedly undesirably in an undesirable manner; "he was unwantedly friendly".
under down to defeat, death, or ruin; "their competitors went under".
untruly in a untrue manner; "he silenced the whisperings which connected her, untruly and unfairly, with his separation from his wife".
vicariously indirectly, as, by, or through a substitute; "she enjoyed the wedding vicariously".
whacking extremely; "a whacking good story".
whopping extremely; "they all were whopping drunk".
smoulderingly smolderingly with barely repressed anger; "`I can't wait,' she answered smolderingly".
directly without anyone or anything intervening; "these two factors are directly related"; "he was directly responsible"; "measured the physical properties directly".
desperately in intense despair; "the child clung desperately to her mother".
lightly without good reason; "one cannot say such things lightly".
sorely painfully in or as if in pain; "she moved painfully forward"; "sorely wounded".
painlessly without pain; "after the surgery, she could move her arms painlessly".
out_of_view out_of_sight no longer visible; "the ship disappeared behind the horizon and passed out of sight".
irreparably in an irreparable manner or to an irreparable degree.
hyperventilate breathe excessively hard and fast; "The mountain climber started to hyperventilate".
puff pant heave gasp breathe noisily, as when one is exhausted; "The runners reached the finish line, panting heavily".
wheeze breathe with difficulty.
puff huff chuff blow hard and loudly; "he huffed and puffed as he made his way up the mountain".
blow exhale hard; "blow on the soup to cool it down".
insufflate blow or breathe hard on or into.
yawn utter a yawn, as from lack of oxygen or when one is tired; "The child yawned during the long performance".
wince make a face indicating disgust or dislike; "She winced when she heard his pompous speech".
twitch jerk make an uncontrolled, short, jerky motion; "his face is twitching".
swash swagger bluster act in an arrogant, overly self-assured, or conceited manner.
wanton behave extremely cruelly and brutally.
shake didder move with or as if with a tremor; "his hands shook".
slumber sleep log_z's kip catch_some_z's be asleep.
sleep_late sleep_in sleep later than usual or customary; "On Sundays, I sleep in".
nod be almost asleep; "The old man sat nodding by the fireplace".
zonk_out fall asleep fast, as when one is extremely tired; "after the long drive, we zonked out and slept for 10 hours".
ulcerate affect with an ulcer; "Her stomach was ulcerated".
stay_up sit_up not go to bed; "Don't stay up so late--you have to go to work tomorrow"; "We sat up all night to watch the election".
swoon pass_out faint conk pass out from weakness, physical or emotional distress due to a loss of blood supply to the brain.
unwind unstrain unlax relax make_relaxed loosen_up cause to feel relaxed; "A hot bath always relaxes me".
unbend release from mental strain, tension, or formality; "unbend the mind from absorbing too much information".
unwind unbend slow_down relax loosen_up decompress become less tense, rest, or take one's ease; "He relaxed in the hot tub"; "Let's all relax after a hard day's work".
take_it_easy sit_back settle into a comfortable sitting position.
fleer to smirk contemptuously.
bray laugh loudly and harshly.
collapse break_down collapse due to fatigue, an illness, or a sudden attack.
cramp suffer from sudden painful contraction of a muscle.
cramp affect with or as if with a cramp.
cackle emit a loud, unpleasant kind of laughing.
cachinnate laugh loudly and in an unrestrained way.
sneer express through a scornful smile; "she sneered her contempt".
lower lour glower frown look angry or sullen, wrinkle one's forehead, as if to signal disapproval.
scowl frown with displeasure.
shrug raise one's shoulders to indicate indifference or resignation.
prank dress up showily; "He pranked himself out in his best clothes".
tart_up dress up in a cheap and provocative way.
dizen bedizen dress up garishly and tastelessly.
underdress dress_down dress informally and casually; "On Fridays, employees can underdress".
overdress overclothe dress too warmly; "You should not overclothe the child--she will be too hot".
underdress dress without sufficient warmth; "She was underdressed for the hiking trip and suffered hypothermia".
peel_off take off, as with some difficulty; "He peeled off his blood-soaked shirt".
wear have_on be dressed in; "She was wearing yellow that day".
drop3 give birth; used for animals; "The cow dropped her calf this morning".
cub give birth to cubs; "bears cub every year".
litter give birth to a litter of animals.
abort terminate a pregnancy by undergoing an abortion.
abort cease development, die, and be aborted; "an aborting fetus".
unsex sterilize sterilise fix desexualize desexualise desex make infertile; "in some countries, people with genetically transmissible disabilites are sterilized".
hatch emerge from the eggs; "young birds, fish, and reptiles hatch".
inflame become inflamed; get sore; "His throat inflamed".
inflame cause inflammation in; "The repetitive motion inflamed her joint".
hurt give trouble or pain to; "This exercise will hurt your back".
indispose cause to feel unwell; "She was indisposed".
suffer hurt feel pain or be in pain.
have2 suffer from; be ill with; "She has arthritis".
whimper wail pule mewl cry weakly or softly; "she wailed with pain".
weep cry shed tears because of sadness, rage, or pain; "She cried bitterly when she heard the news of his death"; "The girl in the wheelchair wept with frustration when she could not get up the stairs".
bawl cry loudly; "Don't bawl in public!".
sob weep convulsively; "He was sobbing inconsolably".
snuffle snivel sniffle blubber blub cry or whine with snuffling; "Stop snivelling--you got yourself into this mess!".
distill distil give off (a liquid); "The doctor distilled a few drops of disinfectant onto the wound".
stream exude profusely; "She was streaming with sweat"; "His nose streamed blood".
swelter suffer from intense heat; "we were sweltering at the beach".
wound injure cause injuries or bodily harm to.
concuss injure the brain; sustain a concussion.
calk injure with a calk.
trouble pain ail cause bodily suffering to and make sick or indisposed.
pull overstretch strain abnormally; "I pulled a muscle in my leg when I jumped up"; "The athlete pulled a tendon in the competition".
constipate bind0 cause to be constipated; "These foods tend to constipate you".
obstipate constipate severely.
frazzle exhaust physically or emotionally; "She was frazzled after the visit of her in-laws".
overweary overtire overfatigue tire excessively.
keep_down manage not to throw up.
retch heave gag make an unsuccessful effort to vomit; strain to vomit.
suffocate strangle gag choke struggle for breath; have insufficient oxygen intake; "he swallowed a fishbone and gagged".
swelter be uncomfortably hot.
suffer feel unwell or uncomfortable; "She is suffering from the hot weather".
ail be ill or unwell.
treat care_for provide treatment for; "The doctor treated my broken leg"; "The nurses cared for the bomb victims"; "The patient must be treated right away or she will die"; "Treat the infection with antibiotics".
correct treat a defect; "The new contact lenses will correct for his myopia".
doctor give medical treatment to.
ease comfort lessen pain or discomfort; alleviate; "ease the pain in your legs".
venesect practice venesection.
wan become pale and sickly.
take2 get3 contract be stricken by an illness, fall victim to an illness; "He got AIDS"; "She came down with pneumonia"; "She took a chill".
sicken make sick or ill; "This kind of food sickens me".
poison administer poison to; "She poisoned her husband but he did not die".
canker become infected with a canker.
traumatize traumatise shock inflict a trauma upon.
galvanize galvanise stimulate (muscles) by administering a shock.
mutilate mar destroy or injure severely; "mutilated bodies".
invalid incapacitate handicap disable injure permanently; "He was disabled in a car accident".
hock disable by cutting the hock.
drop2 devolve deteriorate degenerate grow worse; "Her condition deteriorated"; "Conditions in the slums degenerated"; "The discussion devolved into a shouting match".
recuperate recover convalesce get over an illness or shock; "The patient is recuperating".
retrogress relapse regress recidivate lapse fall_back go back to bad behavior; "Those who recidivate are often minor criminals".
languish fade become feeble; "The prisoner has be languishing for years in the dungeon".
waste0 rot become physically weaker; "Political prisoners are wasting away in many prisons all over the world".
regrow grow anew or continue growth after an injury or interruption; "parts of the trunk of this tree can regrow"; "some invertebrates can regrow limbs or their tail after they lost it due to an injury".
skin_over grow new skin over an injury.
work_out exercise do physical exercise; "She works out in the gym every day".
harm cause or do harm to; "These pills won't harm your system".
redden flush crimson blush turn red, as if in embarrassment or shame; "The girl blushed when a young man whistled as she walked by".
etiolate make pale or sickly; "alcohol etiolates your skin".
suffocate feel uncomfortable for lack of fresh air; "The room was hot and stuffy and we were suffocating".
gown dress in a gown.
jaundice affect with, or as if with, jaundice.
refracture break (a bone) that was previously broken but mended in an abnormal way; "The surgeon had to refracture her wrist".
fracture become fractured; "The tibia fractured from the blow of the iron pipe".
shade pass from one quality such as color to another by a slight degree; "the butterfly wings shade to yellow".
shade vary slightly; "shade the meaning".
brutalize brutalise animalize animalise become brutal or insensitive and unfeeling.
brutalize brutalise animalize animalise make brutal, unfeeling, or inhuman; "Life in the camps had brutalized him".
crackle to become, or to cause to become, covered with a network of small cracks; "The blazing sun crackled the desert sand".
suburbanize suburbanise take on suburban character; "the city suburbanized".
vary change alter become different in some particular way, without permanently losing one's or its former characteristics or essence; "her mood changes in accordance with the weather"; "The supermarket's selection of vegetables varies according to the season".
glaze_over glaze glass_over glass become glassy or take on a glass-like appearance; "Her eyes glaze over when she is bored".
leave_behind leave_alone leave leave unchanged or undisturbed or refrain from taking; "leave it as is"; "leave the young fawn alone"; "leave the flowers that you see in the park behind".
alcoholize alcoholise treat or infuse with alcohol; "alcoholize the fruit and let them sit in the refrigerator".
fall_off fall_away diminish in size or intensity.
sober_up sober become sober after excessive alcohol consumption; "Keep him in bed until he sobers up".
sober cause to become sober; "A sobering thought".
proportion adjust in size relative to other things.
slacken_off flag ease_up ease_off become less intense.
dissimilate become dissimilar or less similar; "These two related tribes of people gradually dissimilated over time".
exchange convert0 commute exchange a penalty for a less severe one.
replace substitute a person or thing for (another that is broken or inefficient or lost or no longer working or yielding what is expected); "He replaced the old razor blade"; "We need to replace the secretary that left a month ago"; "the insurance will replace the lost income"; "This antique vase can never be replaced".
refresh freshen make (to feel) fresh; "The cool water refreshed us".
ruggedize ruggedise produce in a version designed to withstand rough usage; "Detroit ruggedized the family car".
goofproof goof-proof foolproof proof against human misuse or error; "foolproof this appliance".
weatherproof make resistant to bad weather.
revive resurrect restore from a depressed, inactive, or unused state; "He revived this style of opera"; "He resurrected the tango in this remote part of Argentina".
modify make less severe or harsh or extreme; "please modify this letter to make it more polite"; "he modified his views on same-gender marriage".
syncopate modify the rhythm by stressing or accenting a weak beat.
fail1 get worse; "Her health is declining".
tear_off tear_away rip off violently and forcefully; "The passing bus tore off her side mirror".
knock_out destroy or break forcefully; "The windows were knocked out".
put_on add to something existing; "She put on a sun room".
iodize iodise treat with iodine; "iodize salt".
tank treat in a tank; "tank animal refuse".
mercerize mercerise treat to strengthen and improve the luster; "mercerize cotton".
malt treat with malt or malt extract; "malt beer".
creosote treat with creosote; "creosoted wood".
chlorinate treat or combine with chlorine; "chlorinated water".
carbonate treat with carbon dioxide; "Carbonated soft drinks".
camphorate treat with camphor.
brominate bromate treat with bromine.
ammoniate treat with ammonia.
feed_in feed introduce continuously; "feed carrots into a food processor".
inactivate deactivate make inactive; "they deactivated the file".
petrify cause to become stonelike or stiff or dazed and stunned; "The horror petrified his feelings"; "Fear petrified her thinking".
frost damage by frost; "The icy precipitation frosted the flowers and they turned brown".
mitigate make less severe or harsh; "mitigating circumstances".
break2 be broken in; "If the new teacher won't break, we'll add some stress".
pervert misuse abuse change the inherent purpose or function of something; "Don't abuse the system"; "The director of the factory misused the funds intended for the health care of his workers".
worsen decline grow worse; "Conditions in the slum worsened".
slip fall_away drop_off drop_away get worse; "My grades are slipping".
lapse backslide drop to a lower level, as in one's morals or standards.
suffer get worse; "His grades suffered".
suffer1 lose1 be set at a disadvantage; "This author really suffers in translation".
upgrade to improve what was old or outdated; "I've upgraded my computer so I can run better software"; "The company upgraded their personnel".
degrade cheapen lower the grade of something; reduce its worth.
worsen exasperate exacerbate aggravate make worse; "This drug aggravates the pain".
deteriorate become worse or disintegrate; "His mind deteriorated".
go_to_the_dogs go_to_pot become ruined; "His business went to pot when economy soured".
dilapidate decay crumble fall into decay or ruin; "The unoccupied house started to decay".
smut become affected with smut; "the corn smutted and could not be eaten".
addle become rotten; "addled eggs".
dry-rot affect or be affected with dry rot.
decoct steep in hot water.
air-slake alter by exposure to air with conversion at least in part to a carbonate; "air-slake lime".
draggle bedraggle make wet and dirty, as from rain.
moil moisten or soil; "Her tears moiled the letter".
rough-dry dry without smoothing or ironing; "rough-dry the laundry".
scorch become scorched or singed under intense heat or dry conditions; "The exposed tree scorched in the hot sun".
lock become rigid or immoveable; "The therapist noticed that the patient's knees tended to lock in this exercise".
attenuate become weaker, in strength, value, or magnitude.
sandbag protect or strengthen with sandbags; stop up; "The residents sandbagged the beach front".
weaken become weaker; "The prisoner's resistance weakened after seven days".
die1 suffer spiritual death; be damned (in the religious sense); "Whosoever..believes in me shall never die".
thin_out thin reduce9 dilute cut8 lessen the strength or flavor of a solution or mixture; "cut bourbon".
intensify deepen become more intense; "The debate intensified"; "His dislike for raw fish only deepened in Japan".
redouble make twice as great or intense; "The screaming redoubled".
intensify heighten deepen compound make more intense, stronger, or more marked; "The efforts were intensified", "Her rudeness intensified his dislike for her"; "Pot smokers claim it heightens their awareness"; "This event only deepened my convictions".
subside lessen wear off or die down; "The pain subsided".
number keep_down place a limit on the number of.
rust become coated with oxide.
breathe reach full flavor by absorbing air and being let to stand after having been uncorked; "This rare Bordeaux must be allowed to breathe for at least 2 hours".
pole deoxidize molten metals by stirring them with a wooden pole.
shrink reduce reduce in size; reduce physically; "Hot water will shrink the sweater"; "Can you shrink this image?".
blast0 shrivel or wither or mature imperfectly.
slack_off slack let_up die_away abate become less in amount or intensity; "The storm abated"; "The rain let up after a few hours".
pullulate become abundant; increase rapidly.
leapfrog progress by large jumps instead of small increments.
antiquate make obsolete or old-fashioned.
mollify make less rigid or softer.
tumesce tumefy swell_up swell intumesce expand abnormally; "The bellies of the starving children are swelling".
belly_out belly swell out or bulge out.
swell cause to become swollen; "The water swells the wood".
tumefy cause to become very swollen.
break render inoperable or ineffective; "You broke the alarm clock when you took it apart!".
damage inflict damage upon; "The snow damaged the roof"; "She damaged the car when she hit the tree".
bruise damage (plant tissue) by abrasion or pressure; "The customer bruised the strawberries by squeezing them".
disturb damage as if by shaking or jarring; "Don't disturb the patient's wounds by moving him too rapidly!".
smite afflict cause physical pain or suffering in; "afflict with the plague".
visit assail; "He was visited with a terrible illness that killed him quickly".
injure hurt cause damage or affect negatively; "Our business was hurt by the new competition".
touch_on restore repair mend furbish_up fix doctor bushel restore by replacing a part or putting together what is torn or broken; "She repaired her TV set"; "Repair my shoes please".
troubleshoot trouble-shoot solve problems; "He is known to be good at trouble-shooting".
impair make worse or less effective; "His vision was impaired".
ossify cause to become hard and bony; "The disease ossified the tissue".
remit diminish or abate; "The pain finally remitted".
paralyze paralyse cause to be paralyzed and immobile; "The poison paralyzed him"; "Fear paralyzed her".
palsy affect with palsy.
paralyze paralyse make powerless and unable to function; "The bureaucracy paralyzes the entire operation".
stupefy stun make senseless or dizzy by or as if by a blow; "stun fish".
immobilize immobilise cause to be unable to move; "The sudden storm immobilized the traffic".
acerbate make sour or bitter.
fluctuate be unstable; "The stock market fluctuates".
destabilize destabilise become unstable; "The economy destabilized rapidly".
desensitize desensitise make insensitive; "His military training desensitized him".
cauterize cauterise callous make insensitive or callous; deaden feelings or morals.
steel_onself_for steel_oneself_against prepare_for brace_oneself_for prepare mentally or emotionally for something unpleasant.
fret2 eat_away wear away or erode.
wear_away gnaw_at gnaw erode eat_at become ground down or deteriorate; "Her confidence eroded".
ablate wear away through erosion or vaporization.
throw_out_of_kilter perturb derange throw into great confusion or disorder; "Fundamental Islamicists threaten to perturb the social order in Algeria and Egypt".
madder color a moderate to strong red.
smut stain with a dirty substance, such as soot.
complexion give a certain color to; "The setting sun complexioned the hills".
weaken step_down de-escalate reduce the level or intensity or size or scope of; "de-escalate a crisis".
de-escalate diminish in size, scope, or intensity; "The war of words between them de-escalated with time".
mutilate mangle cut_up destroy or injure severely; "The madman mutilates art work".
fit make fit; "fit a dress"; "He fitted other pieces of paper to his cut-out".
unfit indispose disqualify make unfit or unsuitable; "Your income disqualifies you".
tame naturalize naturalise domesticate cultivate adapt (a wild plant or unclaimed land) to the environment; "domesticate oats"; "tame the soil".
toughen make tough or tougher; "This experience will toughen her".
explode burst_forth break_loose be unleashed; emerge with violence or noise; "His anger exploded".
pop2 cause to burst with a loud, explosive sound; "The child popped the balloon".
luxuriate thrive profusely or flourish extensively.
murk make dark, dim, or gloomy.
dim blind make dim by comparison or conceal.
blur blear make dim or indistinct; "The fog blurs my vision".
dim make dim or lusterless; "Time had dimmed the silver".
dim become dim or lusterless; "the lights dimmed and the curtain rose".
overcloud obscure bedim make obscure or unclear; "The distinction was obscured".
veil obscure obliterate hide blot_out make undecipherable or imperceptible by obscuring or concealing; "a hidden message"; "a veiled threat".
depreciate lower the value of something; "The Fed depreciated the dollar once again".
deafen make soundproof; "deafen a room".
shorten become short or shorter; "In winter, the days shorten".
cork stuff with cork; "The baseball player stuffed his bat with cork to make it lighter".
overboil boil excessively; "The peas are overboiled".
simmer boil slowly at low temperature; "simmer the sauce"; "simmering water".
sunder break apart or in two, using violence.
crack break partially but keep its integrity; "The glass cracked".
alligator crack and acquire the appearance of alligator hide, as from weathering or improper application; of paint and varnishes.
come_up arise result or issue; "A slight unpleasantness arose from this discussion".
supervene take place as an additional or unexpected development.
settle2 fall2 descend come as if by falling; "Night fell"; "Silence fell".
fall1 go as if by falling; "Grief fell from our hearts".
materialize materialise happen come into being; become reality; "Her dream really materialized".
dematerialize dematerialise become immaterial; disappear.
persist persevere hold_on hang_on hang_in be persistent, refuse to stop; "he persisted to call me every night"; "The child persisted and kept asking questions".
obstinate persist stubbornly; "he obstinates himself against all rational arguments".
ask_for_trouble ask_for_it persist with actions or an attitude despite the probability that it will cause trouble; "He is asking for trouble with his behavior".
plug_away plug persist in working hard; "Students must plug away at this problem".
lapse end, at least for a long time; "The correspondence lapsed".
abort terminate before completion; "abort the mission"; "abort the process running on my computer".
kill3 tire out completely; "The daily stress of her work is killing her".
suffocate stifle asphyxiate be asphyxiated; die from lack of oxygen; "The child suffocated under the pillow".
leave_behind leave2 be survived by after one's death; "He left six children"; "At her death, she left behind her husband and 11 cats".
widow cause to be without a spouse; "The war widowed many women in the former Yugoslavia".
mist_over mist become covered with mist; "The windshield misted over".
bloat become bloated or swollen or puff up; "The dead man's stomach was bloated".
bog_down bog get stuck while doing something; "She bogged down many times while she wrote her dissertation".
bog_down bog cause to slow down or get stuck; "The vote would bog down the house".
pervaporate evaporate through a semipermeable membrane.
disunify break_apart break up or separate; "The country is disunifying"; "Yugoslavia broke apart after 1989".
overheat get excessively and undesirably hot; "The car engines overheated".
overheat make excessively or undesirably hot; "The room was overheated".
warm_up become more friendly or open; "She warmed up after we had lunch together".
glaciate become frozen and covered with glaciers.
go_up burn_up burn_down burn completely; be consumed or destroyed by fire; "The hut burned down"; "The mountain of paper went up in flames".
smoulder smolder burn slowly and without a flame; "a smoldering fire".
sear scorch make very hot and dry; "The heat scorched the countryside".
fire burn_down burn destroy by fire; "They burned the house and his diaries".
torch burn maliciously, as by arson; "The madman torched the barns".
vesicate blister get blistered; "Her feet blistered during the long hike".
blister cause blisters to form on; "the tight shoes and perspiration blistered her feet".
regenerate reform rectify reclaim bring, lead, or force to abandon a wrong or evil course of life, conduct, and adopt a right one; "The Church reformed me"; "reform your conduct".
waste pine_away languish lose vigor, health, or flesh, as through grief; "After her husband died, she just pined away".
dull become dull or lusterless in appearance; lose shine or brightness; "the varnished table top dulled with time".
pall lose strength or effectiveness; become or appear boring, insipid, or tiresome (to); "the course palled on her".
sharpen heighten make (one's senses) more acute; "This drug will sharpen your vision".
acclimatize acclimatise acclimate get used to a certain climate; "They never acclimatized in Egypt".
conjugate unite chemically so that the product is easily broken down into the original compounds.
digest soften or disintegrate, as by undergoing exposure to heat or moisture.
fold incorporate a food ingredient into a mixture by repeatedly turning it over without stirring or beating; "Fold the egg whites into the batter".
macerate become soft or separate and disintegrate as a result of excessive soaking; "the tissue macerated in the water".
putrefy become putrid; decay with an offensive smell; "organic matter putrefies".
oversimplify make too simple; "Don't oversimplify the instructions".
refine rarify elaborate complicate make more complex, intricate, or richer; "refine a design or pattern".
refine attenuate or reduce in vigor, strength, or validity by polishing or purifying; "many valuable nutrients are refined out of the foods in our modern diet".
perplex complicate make more complicated; "There was a new development that complicated the matter".
snafu cause to be in a state of complete confusion.
bestialize bestialise make brutal and depraved; give animal-like qualities to.
frenchify become French in appearance or character; "This restaurant has Frenchified".
denaturalize denaturalise make less natural or unnatural.
rigidify become rigid; "The body rigidified".
crack_down clamp_down repress or suppress (something regarded as undesirable); "The police clamped down on illegal drugs".
unbrace remove from tension.
pass_off pass3 fleet fade evanesce blow_over disappear gradually; "The pain eventually passed off".
vanish go_away disappear get lost, as without warning or explanation; "He disappeared without a trace".
take_a_powder skip_town disappear without notifying anyone (idiom).
die_out die_off become extinct; "Dinosaurs died out".
minimize minimise make small or insignificant; "Let's minimize the risk".
hedge minimize loss or risk; "diversify your financial portfolio to hedge price risks"; "hedge your bets".
go_bad go0 give_way give_out fail die conk_out break_down break7 stop operating or functioning; "The engine finally went"; "The car died on the road"; "The bus we travelled in broke down on the way to town"; "The coffee maker broke"; "The engine failed on the way to town"; "her eyesight went after the accident".
douse lower quickly; "douse a sail".
slow_up slow_down slow cause to proceed more slowly; "The illness slowed him down".
curdle go bad or sour; "The milk curdled".
fade_out fade_away dissolve become weaker; "The sound faded out".
void vitiate invalidate take away the legal force of or render ineffective; "invalidate a contract".
fill_up fill become full; "The pool slowly filled with water"; "The theater filled up slowly".
water fill with tears; "His eyes were watering".
flood become filled to overflowing; "Our basement flooded during the heavy rains".
scour purge flush rinse, clean, or empty with a liquid; "flush the wound with antibiotics"; "purge the old gas tank".
work6 turn5 sour ferment go sour or spoil; "The milk has soured"; "The wine worked"; "The cream has turned--we have to throw it out".
rush hurry urge to an unnatural speed; "Don't rush me, please!".
hush become quiet or still; fall silent; "hush my baby!".
still silence shut_up quieten hush_up hush cause to be quiet or not talk; "Please silence the children in the church!".
squelch quench quell suppress or crush completely; "squelch any sign of dissent"; "quench a rebellion".
misalign align imperfectly or badly; "the elements of the turbine were misaligned".
standardize standardise cause to conform to standard or norm; "The weights and measures were standardized".
wilt droop become limp; "The flowers wilted".
wilt lose strength; "My opponent was wilting".
obliterate do away with completely, without leaving a trace.
deform become misshapen; "The sidewalk deformed during the earthquake".
vitiate spoil mar impair deflower make imperfect; "nothing marred her beauty".
stub_out press_out extinguish crush_out extinguish by crushing; "stub out your cigar".
fixate fix make fixed, stable or stationary; "let's fix the picture to the frame".
stretch load dilute debase adulterate corrupt, debase, or make impure by adding a foreign or inferior substance; often by replacing valuable ingredients with inferior ones; "adulterate liquor".
sophisticate doctor_up doctor alter and make impure, as with the intention to deceive; "Sophisticate rose water with geraniol".
glorify bestow glory upon; "The victory over the enemy glorified the Republic".
foul become soiled and dirty.
foul make unclean; "foul the water".
devalue lower the value or quality of; "The tear devalues the painting".
insulate protect from heat, cold, or noise by surrounding with insulating material; "We had his bedroom insulated before winter came".
let leave unchanged; "let it be".
ammonify treat with ammonia; cause to undergo ammonification.
calcify become impregnated with calcium salts.
cleanse purge of an ideology, bad thoughts, or sins; "Purgatory is supposed to cleanse you from your sins".
nitrify treat (soil) with nitrates.
vellicate pinch irritate as if by a nip, pinch, or tear; "smooth surfaces can vellicate the teeth"; "the pain is as if sharp points pinch your back".
spot become spotted; "This dress spots quickly".
fox become discolored with, or as if with, mildew spots.
incapacitate disenable disable make unable to perform a certain action; "disable this command on your computer".
lay_up disable or confine, as with an illness; "She was laid up with pneumonia for six weeks".
nobble disable by drugging; "nobble the race horses".
wave_off dismiss as insignificant; "He waved off suggestions of impropriety".
curry treat by incorporating fat; "curry tanned leather".
chrome treat with a chromium compound.
bituminize bituminise treat with bitumen.
interrupt disturb destroy the peace or tranquility of; "Don't interrupt me when I'm reading".
interrupt disrupt interfere in someone else's activity; "Please don't interrupt me while I'm on the phone".
upset disturb the balance or stability of; "The hostile talks upset the peaceful relations between the two countries".
capacitate cause (spermatozoa) to undergo the physical changes necessary to fertilize an egg.
carboxylate treat (a chemical compound) with carboxyl or carboxylic acid.
caseate become cheeselike; "necrotic tissue caseates".
poison envenom add poison to; "Her husband poisoned her drink in order to kill her".
sentimentalize sentimentalise look at with sentimentality or turn into an object of sentiment; "Don't sentimentalize the past events".
rusticate lend a rustic character to; "rusticate the house in the country".
tense increase the tension on; "alternately relax and tense your calf muscle"; "tense the rope manually before tensing the spring".
superannuate become obsolete.
saponify become converted into soap by being hydrolized into an acid and alcohol as a result of being treated with an alkali; "the oil saponified".
poach cook in a simmering liquid; "poached apricots".
dinge make dingy.
decrescendo grow quieter; "The music decrescendoes here".
push_through erupt come_out1 break_through break out; "The tooth erupted and had to be extracted".
turn_on become hostile towards; "The dog suddenly turned on the mailman".
mutilate murder mangle alter so as to make unrecognizable; "The tourists murdered the French language".
disrupt throw into disorder; "This event disrupted the orderly process".
sanitize sanitise make less offensive or more acceptable by removing objectionable features; "sanitize a document before releasing it to the press"; "sanitize history"; "sanitize the language in a book".
take9 be seized or affected in a specified way; "take sick"; "be taken drunk".
prostrate render helpless or defenseless; "They prostrated the enemy".
crush become injured, broken, or distorted by pressure; "The plastic bottle crushed against the wall".
outmode make unfashionable, outdated, or obsolete; "Modern ways of cooking have outmoded the hearth".
run_out give_out fail0 prove insufficient; "The water supply for the town failed after a long drought".
shorten make short or shorter; "shorten the skirt"; "shorten the rope by a few inches".
fall6 assume a disappointed or sad expression; "Her face fell when she heard that she would be laid off"; "his crest fell".
make5 cause to be enjoyable or pleasurable; "make my day".
wrinkle rumple crumple crinkle crease become wrinkled or crumpled or creased; "This fabric won't wrinkle".
dissonate disharmonize cause to sound harsh and unpleasant.
destalinize destalinise counteract the effects and policies of Stalinism; "Russia was slowly destalinized in the late 1950's".
ebb fall away or decline; "The patient's strength ebbed away".
calcify become inflexible and unchanging; "Old folks can calcify".
drift be subject to fluctuation; "The stock market drifted upward".
damp restrain or discourage; "the sudden bad news damped the joyous atmosphere".
keratinize keratinise become horny and impregnated with keratin.
ruin fall into ruin.
subordinate subdue make subordinate, dependent, or subservient; "Our wishes have to be subordinated to that of our ruler".
vesiculate cause to become vesicular or full of air cells; "vesiculate an organ".
vesiculate become vesicular or full of air cells; "The organs vesiculated".
vascularize vascularise become vascular and have vessels that circulate fluids; "The egg yolk vascularized".
scorch destroy completely by or as if by fire; "The wildfire scorched the forest and several homes"; "the invaders scorched the land".
crash1 undergo a sudden and severe downturn; "the economy crashed"; "will the stock market crash again?".
smut make obscene; "This line in the play smuts the entire act".
still make motionless.
flip_out flip0 go mad, go crazy; "He flipped when he heard that he was being laid off".
downsize reduce in size or number; "the company downsized its research staff".
subtract take off or away; "this prefix was subtracted when the word was borrowed from French".
cloud make less clear; "the stroke clouded memories of her youth".
damage suffer or be susceptible to damage; "These fine china cups damage easily".
sense comprehend; "I sensed the real meaning of his letter".
touch3 comprehend; "He could not touch the meaning of the poem".
intuit know or grasp by intuition or feeling.
write_off concede the loss or worthlessness of something or somebody; "write it off as a loss".
get_the_goods discover some bad or hidden information about; "She got the goods on her co-worker after reading his e-mail".
trip_up catch7 detect a blunder or misstep; "The reporter tripped up the senator".
swallow believe or accept without questioning or challenge; "Am I supposed to swallow that story?".
brainwash submit to brainwashing; indoctrinate forcibly.
forget draw_a_blank block3 blank_out be unable to remember; "I'm drawing a blank"; "You are blocking the name of your first wife!".
give_up0 abandon stop maintaining or insisting on; of ideas or claims; "He abandoned the thought of asking for her hand in marriage"; "Both sides have to give up some claims in these negotiations".
forsake desolate desert abandon leave someone who needs or counts on you; leave in the lurch; "The mother deserted her children".
slack be inattentive to, or neglect; "He slacks his attention".
skip_over skip pass_over jump3 bypass; "He skipped a row in the text and so the sentence was incomprehensible".
neglect ignore disregard give little or no attention to; "Disregard the errors".
slight cold-shoulder pay no attention to, disrespect; "She cold-shouldered her ex-fiance".
misremember remember incorrectly; "I misremembered the date".
slip mistake err to make a mistake or be incorrect.
misdate assign the wrong date to.
misunderstand misinterpret misconstrue misconceive misapprehend be_amiss interpret in the wrong way; "Don't misinterpret my comments as criticism"; "She misconstrued my remarks".
stump mix_up cause to be perplexed or confounded; "This problem stumped her".
puddle muddle addle mix up or confuse; "He muddled the issues".
obscure obnubilate confuse blur make unclear, indistinct, or blurred; "Her remarks confused the debate"; "Their words obnubilate their intentions".
puzzle_over try to solve.
throw5 fuddle fox discombobulate confuse confound befuddle bedevil be confusing or perplexing to; cause to be unable to think clearly; "These questions confuse even the experts"; "This question completely threw me"; "This question befuddled even the teacher".
demoralize confuse or put into disorder; "the boss's behavior demoralized everyone in the office".
vex stupefy stick6 puzzle pose perplex nonplus mystify gravel get3 flummox dumbfound bewilder beat2 baffle amaze be a mystery or bewildering to; "This beats me!"; "Got me--I don't know the answer!"; "a vexing problem"; "This question really stuck me".
riddle set a difficult problem or riddle; "riddle me a riddle".
misread misinterpret interpret wrongly; "I misread Hamlet all my life!".
make_out comprehend; "I cannot make out what this politician is saying".
rationalize_away rationalise_away substitute a natural for a supernatural explanation of; "you can rationalize away all the strange noises you hear--there is no poltergeist in the house!".
take_for_granted presume assume take to be the case or to be true; accept without verification or proof; "I assume his train was late".
theorize construct a theory about; "Galileo theorized the motion of the stars".
riddle explain a riddle.
infer guess guess correctly; solve by guessing; "He guessed the right number of beans in the jar and won the prize".
misestimate miscalculate calculate incorrectly; "I miscalculated the number of guests at the wedding".
average_out average compute the average of.
psychoanalyze psychoanalyse analyze analyse subject to psychoanalytic treatment; "I was analyzed in Vienna by a famous psychiatrist".
shoot8 measure the altitude of by using a sextant; "shoot a star".
google search the internet (for information) using the Google search engine; "He googled the woman he had met at the party"; "My children are googling all day".
tell_apart tell severalize severalise separate secernate secern distinguish differentiate mark as different; "We distinguish several kinds of maple".
compare examine and note the similarities or differences of; "John compared his haircut to his friend's"; "We compared notes after we had both seen the movie".
come_round come_around change one's position or opinion; "He came around to our point of view".
stereotype stamp pigeonhole treat or classify according to a mental stereotype; "I was stereotyped as a lazy Southern European".
rate rank range place order grade assign a rank or rating to; "how would you rank these students?"; "The restaurant is rated highly in the food guide".
outclass cause to appear in a lower class; "The Yankees outclassed Cincinnati".
subordinate rank or order as less important or consider of less value; "Art is sometimes subordinated to Science in these schools".
come1 have a certain priority; "My family comes first".
downgrade rate lower; lower in value or esteem.
explode show (a theory or claim) to be baseless, or refute and make obsolete.
negate contradict prove negative; show to be false.
nullify invalidate show to be invalid.
disprove confute prove to be false; "The physicist disproved his colleagues' theories".
refute rebut controvert prove to be false or incorrect.
falsify prove false; "Falsify a claim".
tolerate support1 suffer stomach stick_out stand put_up endure digest brook bear abide put up with something or somebody unpleasant; "I cannot bear his constant criticism"; "The new secretary had to endure a lot of unprofessional remarks"; "he learned to tolerate the heat"; "She stuck out two years in a miserable marriage".
swallow live_with accept tolerate or accommodate oneself to; "I shall have to accept these unpleasant working conditions"; "I swallowed the insult"; "She has learned to live with her husband's little idiosyncrasies".
bear_up endure cheerfully; "She bore up under the enormous strain".
take_lying_down suffer without protest; suffer or endure passively; "I won't take this insult lying down".
sit_out endure to the end.
misjudge judge incorrectly.
overrate overestimate make too high an estimate of; "He overestimated his own powers".
misgauge gauge something incorrectly or improperly.
disapprove consider bad or wrong.
sift sieve distinguish and separate out; "sift through the job candidates".
opt_out cop_out choose not to do something, as out of fear of failing; "She copped out when she was supposed to get into the hang glider".
prepossess prejudice influence (somebody's) opinion in advance.
weight slant angle present with a bias; "He biased his presentation so as to please the share holders".
indispose disincline make unwilling.
prejudge judge beforehand, especially without sufficient evidence.
discredit disbelieve reject as false; refuse to accept.
repudiate refuse to acknowledge, ratify, or recognize as valid; "The woman repudiated the divorce settlement".
reprobate reject (documents) as invalid.
discredit cause to be distrusted or disbelieved; "The paper discredited the politician with its nasty commentary".
suspect mistrust distrust regard as untrustworthy; regard with suspicion; have no faith or confidence in.
backpedal modify one's opinion, make it less strong.
disrespect disesteem have little or no respect for; hold in contempt.
undervalue underestimate assign too low a value to; "Don't underestimate the value of this heirloom-you may sell it at a good price".
overrun run beyond or past; "The plane overran the runway".
trifle play1 dally consider not very seriously; "He is trifling with her"; "She plays with the thought of moving to Tasmania".
flip_out flip react in an excited, delighted, or surprised way; "he flipped when he heard that he was accepted into Princeton University".
greet react to in a certain way; "The President was greeted with catcalls".
wait look expect await look forward to the probable occurrence of; "We were expecting a visit from our relatives"; "She is looking to a promotion"; "he is waiting to be drafted".
look_forward expect or hope for; "I look to hear from you soon".
previse foresee foreknow anticipate realize beforehand.
astound astonish amaze affect with wonder; "Your ability to speak six languages amazes me!".
flabbergast bowl_over boggle overcome with amazement; "This boggles the mind!".
sensualize carnalize ascribe to an origin in sensation.
find_out catch_out trap; especially in an error or in a reprehensible act; "He was caught out"; "She was found out when she tried to cash the stolen checks".
discountenance show disapproval by discouraging; "any measure tending to fuse invalids into a class with special privileges should be discountenanced".
swallow keep from expressing; "I swallowed my anger and kept quiet".
seize grab capture the attention or imagination of; "This story will grab you"; "The movie seized my imagination".
break0 find a flaw in; "break an alibi"; "break down a proof".
call6 challenge the sincerity or truthfulness of; "call the speaker on a question of fact".
intercommunicate communicate transmit thoughts or feelings; "He communicated his anxieties to the psychiatrist".
riddle speak in riddles.
twang pronounce with a nasal twang.
vocalize vocalise phonate utter speech sounds.
clamp impose or inflict forcefully; "The military government clamped a curfew onto the capital".
sting stick5 saddle with something disagreeable or disadvantageous; "They stuck me with the dinner bill"; "I was stung with a huge tax bill".
visit inflict impose bring_down impose something unpleasant; "The principal visited his rage on the students".
give1 inflict as a punishment; "She gave the boy a good spanking"; "The judge gave me 10 years".
overwhelm flood_out deluge charge someone with too many tasks.
demand request urgently and forcefully; "The victim's family is demanding compensation"; "The boss demanded that he be fired immediately"; "She demanded to see the manager".
purport have the often specious appearance of being, intending, or claiming; "The letter purports to express people's opinion".
plea-bargain agree to plead guilty in return for a lesser charge; "If he plea-bargains, he will be sent to a medium-security prison for 8 years".
talk_out_of persuade someone not to do something.
soft-soap persuade someone through flattery.
squabble quibble pettifog niggle brabble bicker argue over petty things; "Let's not quibble over pennies".
wrangle brawl to quarrel noisily, angrily or disruptively; "The bar keeper threw them out, but they continued to wrangle on down the street".
spat engage in a brief and petty quarrel.
oppose controvert contradict be resistant to; "The board opposed his motion".
quest seek alms, as for religious purposes.
tempt lure entice provoke someone to do something through (often false or exaggerated) promises or persuasion; "He lured me into temptation".
stool lure with a stool, as of wild fowl.
pry be nosey; "Don't pry into my personal matters!".
spoonfeed teach without challenging the students; "This professor spoonfeeds his students".
turn_down spurn scorn reject pooh-pooh freeze_off disdain reject with contempt; "She spurned his advances".
refuse decline show unwillingness towards; "he declined to join the group on a hike".
snub repel rebuff reject outright and bluntly; "She snubbed his proposal".
retract resile recant forswear abjure formally reject or disavow a formerly held belief, usually under pressure; "He retracted his earlier statements about his religion"; "She abjured her beliefs".
pass_off disregard; "She passed off the insult".
scoff flout treat with contemptuous disregard; "flout the rules".
turn_a_blind_eye refuse to acknowledge; "He turns a blind eye to the injustices in his office".
tolerate permit allow0 allow the presence of or allow (an activity) without opposing or prohibiting; "We don't allow dogs here"; "Children are not permitted beyond this point"; "We cannot tolerate smoking in the hospital".
clash disagree violently; "We clashed over the new farm policies".
reject disapprove deem wrong or inappropriate; "I disapprove of her child rearing methods".
beg dodge, avoid answering, or take for granted; "beg the question"; "beg the point in the discussion".
short-circuit go_around get_around bypass avoid something unpleasant or laborious; "You cannot bypass these rules!".
shy_away_from avoid having to deal with some unpleasant task; "I shy away from this task".
face_up face confront deal with (something unpleasant) head on; "You must confront your problems"; "He faced the terrible consequences of his mistakes".
respond reply answer react verbally; "She didn't want to answer"; "answer the question"; "We answered that we would accept the invitation".
deny declare untrue; contradict; "He denied the allegations"; "She denied that she had taken money".
repudiate reject as untrue, unfounded, or unjust; "She repudiated the accusations".
deny refuse to recognize or acknowledge; "Peter denied Jesus".
superannuate declare to be obsolete.
take_a_firm_stand insist be emphatic or resolute and refuse to budge; "I must insist!".
stand_pat stand_firm stand_fast hold_firm refuse to abandon one's opinion or belief.
squeal fink confess confess to a punishable or reprehensible deed, usually under pressure.
reprimand criminate censure rebuke formally.
savage pillory crucify blast criticize harshly or violently; "The press savaged the new President"; "The critics crucified the author for plagiarizing a famous passage".
objurgate correct chastise chasten castigate censure severely; "She chastised him for his insensitive remarks".
trounce take_to_task scold reproof reprimand remonstrate rebuke rag lecture lambaste lambast jaw have_words dress_down chide chew_up chew_out call_on_the_carpet call_down berate bawl_out censure severely or angrily; "The mother scolded the child for entering a stranger's car"; "The deputy ragged the Prime Minister"; "The customer dressed down the waiter for bringing cold soup".
tell_off brush_down reprimand; "She told the misbehaving student off".
upbraid reproach express criticism towards; "The president reproached the general for his irresponsible behavior".
pick_apart knock criticize criticise find fault with; express criticism of; point out real or perceived flaws; "The paper criticized the new movie"; "Don't knock the food--it's free".
animadvert express blame or censure or make a harshly critical remark.
belabour belabor attack verbally with harsh criticism; "She was belabored by her fellow students".
come_down criticize or reprimand harshly; "The critics came down hard on the new play".
unteach cause to disbelieve; teach someone the contrary of what he or she had learned earlier.
mislead misinform give false or misleading information to.
lie tell an untruth; pretend with intent to deceive; "Don't lie to your parents"; "She lied when she told me she was only 29".
suborn induce to commit perjury or give false testimony; "The President tried to suborn false witnesses".
suborn procure (false testimony or perjury).
fib tell a relatively insignificant lie; "Fibbing is not acceptable, even if you don't call it lying".
tinge distort colour color affect as in thought or feeling; "My personal feelings color my judgment in this case"; "The sadness tinged his life".
pose personate impersonate pretend to be someone you are not; sometimes with fraudulent intentions; "She posed as the Czar's daughter".
sham pretend feign dissemble affect make believe with the intent to deceive; "He feigned that he was ill"; "He shammed a headache".
take_a_dive pretend to be knocked out, as of a boxer.
talk_through_one's_hat fake bullshit bull speak insincerely or without regard for facts or truths; "The politician was not well prepared for the debate and faked it".
soft-pedal play down or obscure; "His advisers soft-pedaled the president's blunder".
trivialize trivialise make trivial or insignificant; "Don't trivialize the seriousness of the issue!".
rail0 fulminate criticize severely; "He fulminated against the Republicans' plan to cut Medicare"; "She railed against the bad social policies".
tell_on stag snitch shop shit rat grass give_away denounce betray give away information about somebody; "He told on his classmate who had cheated on the exam".
fault blame put or pin the blame on.
pick find_fault blame harass with constant criticism; "Don't always pick on your little brother".
arraign accuse of a wrong or an inadequacy.
impeach charge (a public official) with an offense or misdemeanor committed while in office; "The President was impeached".
peck nag hen-peck bother persistently with trivial complaints; "She nags her husband all day long".
shout clapperclaw blackguard abuse use foul or abusive language towards; "The actress abused the policeman who gave her a parking ticket"; "The angry mother shouted at the teacher".
slang abuse with coarse language.
pick_at disparage belittle express a negative opinion of; "She disparaged her student's efforts".
nitpick be overly critical; criticize minor details.
trash tear_apart pan express a totally negative opinion of; "The critics panned the performance".
assassinate destroy or damage seriously, as of someone's reputation; "He assassinated his enemy's character".
disgrace discredit damage the reputation of; "This newspaper story discredits the politicians".
libel print slanderous statements against; "The newspaper was accused of libeling him".
vituperate vilify revile rail spread negative information about; "The Nazi propaganda vilified the Jews".
insult diss affront treat, mention, or speak to rudely; "He insulted her with his rude remarks"; "the student who had betrayed his classmate was dissed by everyone".
mind be offended or bothered by; take offense with, be bothered by; "I don't mind your behavior".
mock bemock treat with contempt; "The new constitution mocks all democratic principles".
caricature ape represent in or produce a caricature of; "The drawing caricatured the President".
scoff jeer gibe flout barrack laugh at with contempt and derision; "The crowd jeered at the speaker".
twit tease taunt tantalize tantalise ride razz rally rag cod bait harass with persistent criticism or carping; "The children teased the new teacher"; "Don't ride me so hard over my failure"; "His fellow workers razzed him when he wore a jacket and tie".
pull_the_leg_of kid tell false information to for fun; "Are you pulling my leg?".
needle goad goad or provoke,as by constant criticism; "He needled her with his sarcastic remarks".
satirize satirise lampoon ridicule with satire; "The writer satirized the politician's proposal".
deride treat or speak of with contempt; "He derided his student's attempt to solve the biggest problem in mathematics".
lead_astray deceive betray cause someone to believe an untruth; "The insurance company deceived me when they told me they were covering my house".
kid josh jolly chaff banter be silly or tease one another; "After we relaxed, we just kidded around".
vilipend depreciate deprecate belittle; "The teacher should not deprecate his student's efforts".
condemn declare or judge unfit for use or habitation; "The building was condemned by the inspector".
glory rejoice proudly.
jolly_up jolly_along cheer_up cheer cause (somebody) to feel happier or more cheerful; "She tried to cheer up the disappointed child when he failed to win the spelling bee".
explode drive from the stage by noisy disapproval.
rip criticize or abuse strongly and violently; "The candidate ripped into his opponent mercilessly".
whip scald blister subject to harsh criticism; "The Senator blistered the administration in his speech on Friday"; "the professor scaled the students"; "your invectives scorched the community".
reprobate objurgate excoriate decry condemn express strong disapproval of; "We condemn the racism in South Africa"; "These ideas were reprobated".
minimize derogate denigrate belittle cause to seem less serious; play down; "Don't belittle his influence".
talk_down belittle through talk.
execrate comminate anathemize anathemise anathematize anathematise accurse curse or declare to be evil or anathema or threaten with divine punishment.
maledict imprecate damn curse beshrew bedamn anathemize anathemise wish harm upon; invoke evil upon; "The bad witch cursed the child".
impugn attack as false or wrong.
warn notify of danger, potential harm, or risk; "The director warned him that he might be fired"; "The doctor warned me about the dangers of smoking".
threaten to utter intentions of injury or punishment against:"He threatened me when I tried to call the police".
threaten to be a menacing indication of something:"The clouds threaten rain"; "Danger threatens".
urge recommend advocate push for something; "The travel agent recommended strongly that we not travel on Thanksgiving Day".
misguide misadvise give bad advice to.
return6 submit (a report, etc.) to someone in authority; "submit a bill to a legislative body".
stroke treat gingerly or carefully; "You have to stroke the boss".
preen congratulate pride or congratulate (oneself) for an achievement.
undertake guarantee promise to do or accomplish; "guarantee to free the prisoners".
underwrite insure cover4 protect by insurance; "The insurance won't cover this".
apologize apologise acknowledge faults or shortcomings or failing; "I apologized for being late"; "He apologized for the many typoes".
alibi exonerate by means of an alibi.
plead offer as an excuse or plea; "She was pleading insanity".
stick_up stand_up defend against attack or criticism; "He stood up for his friend"; "She stuck up for the teacher who was accused of harassing the student".
salute greet in a friendly way; "I meet this men every day on my way to work and he salutes me".
purge clear of a charge.
sound_off quetch plain kvetch kick complain express complaints, discontent, displeasure, or unhappiness; "My mother complains all day"; "She has a lot to kick about".
yawp yammer whine grizzle complain whiningly.
patronize patronise condescend treat condescendingly.
scold grumble grouch show one's unhappiness or critical attitude; "He scolded about anything that he thought was wrong"; "We grumbled about the increased work load".
coo cry softly, as of pigeons.
squawk holler grouse gripe crab bitch bellyache beef complain; "What was he hollering about?".
rail inveigh complain bitterly.
lament deplore bewail bemoan regret strongly; "I deplore this hostile action"; "we lamented the loss of benefits".
regret express with regret; "I regret to say that you did not gain admission to Harvard".
repudiate refuse to recognize or pay; "repudiate a debt".
shout outcry exclaim cry_out cry call_out utter aloud; often with surprise, horror, or joy; "`I won!' he exclaimed"; "`Help!' she cried"; "`I'm here,' the mother shouted when she saw her child looking lost".
whoop shout, as if with joy or enthusiasm; "The children whooped when they were led to the picnic table".
throw_in put_in interpose interject inject come_in to insert between other elements; "She interjected clever remarks".
whisper speak softly; in a low voice.
venture pretend hazard guess put forward, of a guess, in spite of possible refutation; "I am guessing that the price of real estate will rise again"; "I cannot pretend to say that you are wrong".
guesstimate estimate based on a calculation.
watch see learn find_out determine check1 ascertain find out, learn, or determine with certainty, usually by making an inquiry or other effort; "I want to see whether she speaks French"; "See whether it works"; "find out if he speaks Russian"; "Check whether the train leaves on time".
suspect surmise imagine to be the case or true or probable; "I suspect he is a fugitive"; "I surmised that the butler did it".
marvel express astonishment or surprise about something.
formulate explicate develop elaborate, as of theories and hypotheses; "Could you develop the ideas in your thesis".
speculate talk over conjecturally, or review in an idle or casual way and with an element of doubt or without sufficient reason to reach a conclusion; "We were speculating whether the President had to resign after the scandal".
contraindicate make a treatment inadvisable.
imply connote express or state indirectly.
burst_out give sudden release to an expression; "We burst out laughing"; "'I hate you,' she burst out".
rip_out burst out with a violent or profane utterance; "ripped out a vicious oath"; "ripped out with an oath".
bewray betray reveal unintentionally; "Her smile betrayed her true feelings".
unbosom relieve relieve oneself of troubling information.
misspell spell incorrectly.
obfuscate make obscure or unclear.
drop utter with seeming casualness; "drop a hint"; drop names".
numerate number enumerate count determine the number or amount of; "Can you count the books on your shelf?"; "Count your change".
miscount count wrongly.
raise0 pronounce (vowels) by bringing the tongue closer to the roof of the mouth; "raise your `o'".
platitudinize utter platitudes; "The candidate platitudinized and bored the audience".
qualify characterize characterise describe or portray the character or the qualities or peculiarities of; "You can characterize his behavior as that of an egotist"; "This poem can be characterized as a lament for a dead lover".
mistranslate translate incorrectly.
slang use slang or vulgar language.
report complain about; make a charge against; "I reported her to the supervisor".
bandy_about discuss casually; "bandy about an idea".
misname miscall assign in incorrect name to; "These misnamed philanthropists".
ballyhoo advertize noisily or blatantly.
sputter splutter utter with a spitting sound, as if in a rage.
misdirect misaddress put a wrong address on; "misdirect the letter".
touch-type type without looking at the keyboard.
scribble scrabble write down quickly without much attention to detail.
block_out indicate roughly; "We sketched out our plan".
get_out express with difficulty; "I managed to get out a few words".
misquote quote incorrectly; "He had misquoted the politician".
underquote quote a price lower than that quoted by (another seller).
invoke appeal cite as an authority; resort to; "He invoked the law that would save him"; "I appealed to the law of 1900"; "She invoked an ancient law".
stick_in sneak_in slip_in insert insert casually; "She slipped in a reference to her own work".
dredge_up drag_up mention something unpleasant from the past; "Drag up old stories".
speak_up speak_out sound_off opine animadvert express one's opinion openly and without fear or hesitation; "John spoke up at the meeting".
post2 brand mark or expose as infamous; "She was branded a loose woman".
theologize theologise treat from a theological viewpoint or render theological in character.
whore compromise oneself for money or other gains; "She whored herself to Hollywood".
scupper queer peril expose endanger put in a dangerous, disadvantageous, or difficult position.
compromise expose or make liable to danger, suspicion, or disrepute; "The nuclear secrets of the state were compromised by the spy".
smatter blither blether blather babble to talk foolishly; "The two women babbled and crooned at the baby".
shut_up keep_mum dummy_up close_up clam_up button_up belt_up be_quiet refuse to talk or stop talking; fall silent; "The children shut up when their father approached".
gossip dish_the_dirt wag one's tongue; speak about others and reveal secrets or intimacies; "She won't dish the dirt".
grunt issue a grunting, low, animal-like noise; "He grunted his reluctant approval".
mutter mussitate mumble maunder talk indistinctly; usually in a low voice.
snort indicate contempt by breathing noisily and forcefully through the nose; "she snorted her disapproval of the proposed bridegroom".
spit_out spit utter with anger or contempt.
moan groan indicate pain, discomfort, or displeasure; "The students groaned when the professor got out the exam booklets"; "The ancient door soughed when opened".
rumble grumble growl to utter or emit low dull rumbling sounds; "he grumbled a rude response"; "Stones grumbled down the cliff".
wawl waul squall make high-pitched, whiney noises.
bark speak in an unfriendly tone; "She barked into the dictaphone".
roar bellow make a loud noise, as of animal; "The bull bellowed".
squawk skreigh skreak screech screak utter a harsh abrupt scream.
soften moderate mince make less severe or harsh; "He moderated his tone when the students burst out in tears".
snub ignore disregard cut1 refuse to acknowledge; "She cut him dead at the meeting".
gargle utter with gargling or burbling sounds.
throw give convey or communicate; of a smile, a look, a physical gesture; "Throw a glance"; "She gave me a dirty look".
catcall utter catcalls at.
hypothecate pledge without delivery or title of possession.
babble utter meaningless sounds, like a baby, or utter in an incoherent way; "The old man is only babbling--don't pay attention".
give5 accord by verdict; "give a decision for the plaintiff".
stet printing: direct that a matter marked for omission or correction is to be retained (used in the imperative).
snooker leave one's opponent unable to take a direct shot.
misplay play wrong or in an unskillful manner.
bluff_out bluff deceive an opponent by a bold bet on an inferior hand with the result that the opponent withdraws a winning hand.
stalemate subject to a stalemate.
face confront oppose, as in hostility or a competition; "You must confront your opponent"; "Jackson faced Smith in the boxing ring"; "The two enemies finally confronted each other".
front breast confront bodily; "breast the storm".
take_the_bull_by_the_horns face a difficulty and grapple with it without avoiding it.
bear_down exert full strength; "The pitcher bore down".
throw_in_the_towel throw_in quit give_up fall_by_the_wayside drop_out drop_by_the_wayside chuck_up_the_sponge give up in the face of defeat of lacking hope; admit defeat; "In the second round, the challenger gave up".
smash overthrow or destroy (something considered evil or harmful); "The police smashed the drug ring after they were tipped off".
hinder handicap hamper put at a disadvantage; "The brace I have to wear is hindering my movements".
disarm demilitarize demilitarise remove offensive capability from.
recalcitrate show strong objection or repugnance; manifest vigorous opposition or resistance; be obstinately disobedient; "The Democratic senators recalcitrated against every proposal from the Republican side".
settle9 get_back get one's revenge for a wrong or an injury; "I finally settled with my old enemy".
combat battle battle or contend against in or as if in a battle; "The Kurds are combating Iraqi troops in Northern Iraq"; "We must combat the prejudices against other races"; "they battled over the budget".
take_up_arms take_arms go_to_war commence hostilities.
make_peace end hostilities; "The brothers who had been fighting over their inheritance finally made peace".
criticize criticise act as a critic; "Those who criticize others often are not perfect, either".
lose fail to win; "We lost the battle but we won the war".
go_down be defeated; "If America goes down, the free world will go down, too".
down bring down or defeat (an opponent).
crush break_down make ineffective; "Martin Luther King tried to break down racial discrimination".
overcome have_the_best get_the_best overcome, usually through no fault or weakness of the person that is overcome; "Heart disease can get the best of us".
surpass surmount outstrip outperform outmatch outgo outdo exceed be or do something to a greater degree; "her performance surpasses that of any other student I know"; "She outdoes all other athletes"; "This exceeds all my expectations"; "This car outperforms all others in its class".
outsell be sold more often than other, similar products; "The new Toyota outsells the Honda by a wide margin".
out-herod surpass someone in cruelty or evil.
take_the_cake rank first; used often in a negative context; "He takes the cake for chutzpah!".
upset defeat suddenly and unexpectedly; "The foreign team upset the local team".
overwhelm overpower overmaster overcome by superior force.
score get a certain number or letter indicating quality or performance; "She scored high on the SAT"; "He scored a 200".
test achieve a certain score or rating on a test; "She tested high on the LSAT and was admitted to all the good law schools".
conquer overcome by conquest; "conquer your fears"; "conquer a country".
bait attack with dogs or set dogs upon.
sic set9 urge to attack someone; "The owner sicked his dogs on the intruders"; "the shaman sics sorcerers on the evil spirits".
stand1 resist fend withstand the force of something; "The trees resisted her"; "stand the test of time"; "The mountain climbers had to fend against the ice and snow".
stand_up refuse to back down; remain solid under criticism or attack.
concede acknowledge defeat; "The candidate conceded after enough votes had come in to show that he would lose".
attack aggress take the initiative and go on the offensive; "The Serbs attacked the village at night"; "The visiting team started to attack".
rush attack suddenly.
set_on attack assault assail attack someone physically or emotionally; "The mugger assaulted the woman"; "Nightmares assailed him regularly".
harass exhaust by attacking repeatedly; "harass the enemy".
savage attack brutally and fiercely.
outvie outrival be more of a rival than.
protect shield from danger, injury, destruction, or damage; "Weatherbeater protects your roof from the rain".
overprotect protect excessively; "Don't overprotect your son--he is an adult now!".
look_out to protect someone's interests; "A man's gotta look out for his family".
ward guard watch over or shield from danger or harm; protect; "guard my possessions while I'm away".
hold0 guard defend protect against a challenge or attack; "Hold that position behind the trees!"; "Hold the bridge against the enemy's attacks".
shield screen protect, hide, or conceal from danger or harm.
charm protect through supernatural powers or charms.
turn_back stop hold_back contain check8 arrest hold back, as of a danger or an enemy; check the expansion or influence of; "Arrest the downward trend"; "Check the growth of communism in South East Asia"; "Contain the rebel movement"; "Turn back the tide of communism".
bomb_out make somebody homeless by destroying their houses with bombs.
crump bombard with heavy shells.
fusillade attack with fusillade.
strive strain reach to exert much effort or energy; "straining our ears to hear".
extend_oneself strain to the utmost.
foul commit a foul; break the rules.
cover2 protect or defend (a position in a game); "he covered left field".
defend champion protect or fight for as a champion.
weightlift weight-lift press3 lift weights; "This guy can press 300 pounds".
strike_back retaliate make a counterattack and return like for like, especially evil for evil; "The Empire strikes back"; "The Giants struck back and won the opener"; "The Israeli army retaliated for the Hamas bombing".
revenge retaliate avenge take revenge for a perceived wrong; "He wants to avenge the murder of his brother".
mothproof protect from moths; "mothproof woollen clothes during the summer".
raise6 bid (one's partner's suit) at a higher level.
drain deplete of resources; "The exercise class drains me of energy".
pull_out_all_the_stops use all resources available; "The organizers pulled out all the stops for the centennial meeting".
misuse misapply apply to a wrong thing or person; apply badly or incorrectly; "The words are misapplied in this context"; "You are misapplying the name of this religious group".
cannibalize cannibalise eat human flesh.
rehash present or use over, with no or few changes.
mine get from the earth by excavation; "mine ores and metals".
overexploit exploit excessively; "We should not overexploit our natural resources".
overstrain overextend strain excessively; "He overextended himself when he accepted the additional assignment".